Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Penalties

237.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

237.030

to

237.050

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

237.030

to

237.050

, and in so doing uses any destructive device or booby trap device to avoid detection by law enforcement or other government personnel or to avoid theft or detection by any other person, of any controlled substance as set forth in KRS Chapter 218A and held in violation of KRS

218A.140

, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 33, § 4; 1990, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 28, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.